Illinois, session 104th, HB5538.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.8    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 9required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 10equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 11defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 12greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 13or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 14exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 15obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 16regulations.17    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 18required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 19equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 20defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 21otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 22regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 23relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply   HB5538- 2 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1with other applicable rules or regulations.2    (c) (Blank). 3    (d) (Blank).4    (e) (Blank). 5    (f) As used in this Section:6    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 7output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 8Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 9Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 10    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 11sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 12calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 13greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 14by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 15CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 16them all together.17    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 18system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 19electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 20source.21    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 22have been identified by the United States Environmental 23Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.24    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 25fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 26cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate   HB5538- 3 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 2sale.3    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 4that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 5and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 6program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.7    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 8community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 9would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 10designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 11economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 12following areas:13        (1) areas where residents have been historically 14    excluded from economic opportunities, including 15    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 16    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 17    Tax Act; and18        (2) areas where residents have been historically 19    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 20    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 21    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 22    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 23    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.24    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 25means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 26investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and   HB5538- 4 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 2person means the following people:3        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 4    investment eligible community;5        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 6    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 7    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 8    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 9    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 10    the last 5 years;11        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 12    in the foster care system; or13        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.14    "Existing emissions" means: 15        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 16    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 17    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 18    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 19    that unit's operation; and20        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 21    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 22    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 23    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 24    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 25    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 26an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic   HB5538- 5 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 2copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 3electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 4energy source.5    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 6GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 7unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 8nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 9capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 10including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 11oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.12    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 13emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 14Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 15Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 16recent year for which data is available.17    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 18GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 19including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 20by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 21municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 22other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 23and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.24    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 25output emission rate" as measured by the United States 26Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation   HB5538- 6 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 2most recent year for which data is available.3    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 4use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 5shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 6zero no later than January 1, 2030.7    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 8use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 9permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 10December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 11also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 12emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 13reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 14the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 15its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 162038.17    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 18use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 19permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 20including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 21hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 22proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 23following:24        (1) No later than January 1, 2040 2030: all EGUs and 25    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx 26    emissions rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2   HB5538- 7 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1    emission rate of greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are 2    located in or within 3 miles of an environmental justice 3    community designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity 4    investment eligible community.5        (2) No later than January 1, 2050 2040: all EGUs and 6    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx 7    emission rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 8    emission rate greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not 9    located in or within 3 miles of an environmental justice 10    community designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity 11    investment eligible community. After January 1, 2045 2035, 12    each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall 13    reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing 14    emissions for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, 15    on average, 6 hours or less per day, measured over a 16    calendar year, and shall not run for more than 24 17    consecutive hours except in emergency conditions, as 18    designated by a Regional Transmission Organization or 19    Independent System Operator.20        (3) No later than January 1, 2045 2035: all EGUs and 21    large greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation 22    prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 23    102nd General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less 24    than or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less 25    than or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 26    3 miles of an environmental justice community designated   HB5538- 8 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1    as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 2    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 3    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 4    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 5    2040 2030.6        (4) No later than January 1, 2050 2040: All remaining 7    EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a 8    heat rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such 9    EGU and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce 10    its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing 11    emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 2045 2035.12        (5) No later than January 1, 2055 2045: all remaining 13    EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 14    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 15use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 16permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 17including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 18hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 19proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2055 202045.21    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 22utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 23shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 24zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 25green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 26commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by   HB5538- 9 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1January 1, 2055 2045.2    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 3uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 4emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 5that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 6    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 7GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 8emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 9specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 10been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 11this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 12necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 13ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 14EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 15operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 16reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 17GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:18        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 19    participant in a regional transmission organization 20    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 21    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 22    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 23    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 24    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;25        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 26    participant in a regional transmission organization   HB5538- 10 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1    receives notice that the regional transmission 2    organization has determined that continued operation of 3    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 4    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 5    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 6    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 7    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 8    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 9    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 10    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 11    identified by the regional transmission organization is 12    resolved; and13        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 14    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 15    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 16    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 17    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 18    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 19    Illinois Commerce Commission.20    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 21relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 22emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 23Section.24    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 25shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 26forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual   HB5538- 11 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 2the prior year.3    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 4Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 5Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 6publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 7State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 8development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 9emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 10developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 11current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 12reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 13years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 14Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 15Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 16Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 17Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 18regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 19anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 20development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 21unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 22The report shall be released publicly by no later than 23December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 24Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 25Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 26data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable   HB5538- 12 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 2and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 3the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 4subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 5adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 6sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 7MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 8regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 9transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 10will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 11the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 12Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 13or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 14requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 15to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 16State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 17deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 18reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 19with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 20appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 21energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 22development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 23resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.24        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 25    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 26    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and   HB5538- 13 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 2    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 3    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 4    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 5    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 6    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 7    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 8    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 9    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 10    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 11    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 12    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 13    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 14    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 15    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 16    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 17    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 18    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 19    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 20    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 21    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 22    approval.23        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 24    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 25    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 26    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the   HB5538- 14 -LRB104 16311 BDA 29697 b1    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 2    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 3    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 4    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 5    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 6    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 7    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 8    mitigation plan within 180 days.9        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 10    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 11    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 12    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 13    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 14    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 15    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 16    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 17    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 18    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 19    increases in emissions.20        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 21    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 22    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 23    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 24    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 25    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 26(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.)